Illinois, session 104th, SB3855.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Engineering Students of Illinois Scholarship Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to attract 7capable and promising students to the engineering profession 8and to increase employment and retention of individuals who 9are working toward or who have received a master's or doctoral 10degree in engineering. 11    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act: 12    "Approved program of professional engineering education" 13means a program of engineering approved by the Department of 14Financial and Professional Regulation. 15    "Commission" means the Illinois Student Assistance 16Commission.17    "Institution of higher learning" means a public university 18of this State.19    "Program" means the program created under Section 15. 20    Section 15. Engineering Students of Illinois Scholarship 21Program. There is created, beginning July 1, 2027, the   SB3855- 2 -LRB104 17966 LNS 31403 b1Engineering Students of Illinois Scholarship Program, to be 2administered by the Commission. The Program shall provide 3scholarship assistance until July 1, 2031, subject to 4appropriation, to eligible students for engineering-related 5study. 6    Section 20. Scholarship award; stipend; maximum time 7period; maximum amount. 8    (a) Subject to appropriation, the Commission shall award 9an engineering scholarship to each qualified applicant in an 10amount sufficient to pay the tuition and fees of the 11institution of higher learning at which the recipient is 12enrolled, up to the maximum amount of tuition and fees charged 13to students enrolled in an approved program of professional 14engineering education at the institution of higher learning. 15    (b) A scholarship recipient under this Act shall also 16receive a stipend, the amount of which may not exceed $10,000, 17to cover other costs of attendance, including, but not limited 18to, living expenses. Stipend amounts for recipients enrolled 19on less than a full-time basis shall be prorated by credit 20hour. 21    (c) A recipient may receive scholarship assistance under 22the Program for the equivalent of 8 semesters or 16 quarters of 23full-time enrollment. 24    (d) The total amount of scholarship assistance awarded by 25the Commission under the Program to an individual in any given   SB3855- 3 -LRB104 17966 LNS 31403 b1fiscal year, when added to other financial assistance awarded 2to that individual for that year, may not exceed the cost of 3attendance at the institution of higher learning at which the 4student is enrolled. 5    Section 25. Application. All applications for a 6scholarship under the Program shall be made to the Commission 7in a form and manner prescribed by the Commission. Applicants 8shall also submit any supporting documents deemed necessary by 9the Commission at the time of application. 10    Section 30. Eligibility; work agreement. 11    (a) The Commission shall, on an annual basis until July 1, 122031, receive and consider applications for scholarship 13assistance under the Program. An applicant is eligible for a 14scholarship under the Program if the Commission finds that the 15applicant: 16        (1) is a United States citizen or permanent resident; 17        (2) is a resident of this State; and18        (3) is enrolled or accepted for enrollment on a 19    full-time basis in an approved program of professional 20    engineering education at an institution of higher 21    learning. 22    (b) Scholarship recipients under this Act shall be 23selected from among eligible applicants based on a combination 24of academic excellence and financial need, as determined by   SB3855- 4 -LRB104 17966 LNS 31403 b1the Commission. 2    (c) Preference may be given to previous recipients of a 3scholarship under the Program, as long as the recipient 4continues to meet the eligibility requirements set forth in 5this Section and maintains satisfactory academic progress as 6determined by the institution of higher learning at which the 7recipient is enrolled. 8    (d) Prior to receiving scholarship assistance for an 9academic year, each recipient of a scholarship awarded under 10the Program must sign an agreement pledging that, within one 11year following the termination of the academic program for 12which the recipient was awarded a scholarship, the recipient 13shall (i) begin working as an engineer for the Department of 14Transportation for a period of not less than 3 years and (ii) 15upon request of the Commission, provide the Commission with 16evidence that the recipient is fulfilling or has fulfilled the 17terms of the work agreement required under this subsection. 18    Section 35. Payment to institution of higher education. 19All scholarship funds distributed under the Program shall be 20paid to the institution of higher learning on behalf of the 21scholarship recipient.  22    Section 40. Repayment upon default; exception. 23    (a) If a recipient of a scholarship awarded under this Act 24fails to fulfill the work agreement required under the   SB3855- 5 -LRB104 17966 LNS 31403 b1Program, the Commission shall require the recipient to repay 2the amount of the scholarship or scholarships received, 3prorated according to the fraction of the work agreement not 4completed, plus interest at a rate of 5% and, if applicable, 5reasonable collection fees. 6    (b) Payments received by the Commission under this Section 7shall be remitted to the State Comptroller for deposit into 8the General Revenue Fund, except that that portion of a 9recipient's repayment that equals the amount in expenses that 10the Commission has reasonably incurred in attempting 11collection from that recipient shall be remitted to the State 12Comptroller for deposit into the ISAC Accounts Receivable 13Fund. 14    (c) A recipient of a scholarship awarded under the Program 15is not in violation of the work agreement entered into 16pursuant to this Act if the recipient is (i) serving as a 17member of the armed services of the United States, (ii) 18temporarily totally disabled, as established by a sworn 19affidavit of a qualified physician, (iii) seeking and unable 20to find employment as an engineer with the Department of 21Transportation and is able to provide evidence of that fact, 22or (iv) taking additional courses, on a full-time basis, 23related to engineering. Any extension of the period during 24which the work agreement must be fulfilled is subject to 25limitations of duration established by the Commission.   SB3855- 6 -LRB104 17966 LNS 31403 b1    Section 80. Rulemaking. The Commission shall adopt all 2rules necessary for the administration of this Act. 3    Section 85. Repealer. This Act is repealed on July 1, 42032. 5    Section 90. The Board of Higher Education Act is amended 6by adding Section 9.47 as follows: 7    (110 ILCS 205/9.47 new)8    Sec. 9.47. Competitive engineering grants. In order to 9increase the number of engineering students graduating from 10public institutions of higher education, the Board shall 11establish and administer a competitive grant program for 12public institutions of higher education that award degrees in 13engineering. The grants may be awarded on the basis of 14performance criteria, which shall include, but not be limited 15to, degree production, student retention, and passage rates on 16professional licensure examinations.17    The Board shall adopt those rules that are necessary for 18the implementation and administration of the grants 19established under this Section.